Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 9 Victim Restitution

§ 7-9-101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Criminal activity” means any crime for which there is a plea of guilty, nolo contendere or verdict of guilty upon which a judgment of conviction may be rendered and includes any other crime which is admitted by the defendant, whether or not prosecuted. In the case of restitution ordered under W.S.

7-13-301

, “criminal activity” also includes a crime charged against the defendant;

“Long-term physical health care restitution order” means an order entered pursuant to W.S.

7-9-113

through

7-9-115

;

“Pecuniary damage” means all damages which a victim could recover against the defendant in a civil action arising out of the same facts or event, including damages for wrongful death. It does not include punitive damages and damages for pain, suffering, mental anguish and loss of consortium;

“Restitution” means full or partial payment of pecuniary damage to a victim;

“Victim” means a person who has suffered pecuniary damage as a result of a defendant’s criminal activities. An insurer which paid any part of a victim’s pecuniary damages shall be regarded as the victim only if the insurer has no right of subrogation and the insured has no duty to pay the proceeds of restitution to the insurer.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 34, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-307

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1991, ch. 77, § 1; ch. 167, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to civil liability for the theft of identity, see §

1-1-128

.

As to unauthorized use of personal identifying information, see §

6-3-901

.

As to actions for wrongful death, see chapter 38 of title 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

“Victim.” —

Defendant was properly ordered to pay restitution to an insured victim because (1) there was no evidence in the record of a subrogation right, or lack thereof, so the insurer was not a victim entitled to restitution, (2) it was absurd not to order the defendant to pay anyone for damage defendant caused, and (3) equitable subrogation did not assist defendant, since, if a right of subrogation existed, the court had to award restitution to the owner of property defendant damaged, and (4) whether the victim would receive a double recovery was of no consequence, since restitution was a criminal penalty meant to have deterrent and rehabilitative effects. Hudson v. State, 2020 WY 86, 466 P.3d 839,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2020).

Types of damages awardable. —

This section and §

7-9-103

allow a court in a criminal case to award as restitution the same damages as are available in a civil case; however, certain types of damages, such as punitive damages and damages for pain, suffering, mental anguish, and loss of consortium, may not be awarded. Meerscheidt v. State, 931 P.2d 220,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1997).

“Pecuniary damage.” —

The trial court erred by awarding restitution to crime victims for their loss of enjoyment of life, because the legislature intended to exclude such damages from the definition of “pecuniary damages.” Meerscheidt v. State, 931 P.2d 220,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1997).

Order that the defendant pay as restitution, following his conviction for felony larceny, the entire cost of a surveillance system installed by his employer to investigate the ongoing thefts defendant was later convicted of, was error since the store owner admitted the surveillance equipment would be used after defendant's apprehension, and its continued benefit was a reason why he purchased the equipment. Alcaraz v. State, 2002 WY 57, 44 P.3d 68,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2002).

After defendant pled guilty to wrongfully taking or disposing of property, a district court erred by failing to set restitution based on the readily ascertainable fair market value of a stolen pickup truck since there was no support for the contention that the truck had a special, unique, or sentimental value; moreover, defendant did not waive the right to challenge the sentence imposed by signing the plea agreement. Bush v. State, 2003 WY 156, 79 P.3d 1178,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 2003).

Defendant's judgment and sentence violated Wyo. R. Crim. P. 32(c)(2)(H) where, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-9-103(b) and Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-9-101(a)(iii), the sentencing court did not specify a victim, and it was impossible to tell if “loss of support” fit the statutory definition of “pecuniary damage”; the state failed to prove a victim's legal entitlement to restitution.
Hite v. State, 2007 WY 199, 172 P.3d 737,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 2007).

After defendant was convicted of felony property destruction, he claimed that the district court erred in ordering him to pay restitution in the amount of $1,400, the estimated value of the vehicle before the damage; it was not clear whether the district court ordered defendant to pay that amount because defense counsel did not object to the presentence investigation or because it concluded that the fair market value was the appropriate measure of restitution. Defense counsel did not waive the issue by his failure to object to the PSI because he sufficiently placed it before the sentencing court in challenging the appropriateness of the amount at the sentencing hearing and should the issue arise in any proceedings upon remand, the district court was required to take into account the prevailing law under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-9-101(a)(iii).
Morris v. State, 2009 WY 88, 210 P.3d 1101,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2009).

In a larceny by bailee case, a restitution order was erroneous due to calculation errors made by the prosecution, and this amount was not offset by a claim made by the State. Moreover, there was no abuse of discretion in failing to find that certain expenses were legitimate where such claim was rejected by the jury, and no new evidence was offered on appeal. Hibsman v. State, 2015 WY 122, 355 P.3d 1240,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2015).

Cost for changing locks result of “criminal activity.”
—

An order of restitution for the costs associated with the changing of the victim's locks was proper where the victim had her locks changed as a result of the defendant's criminal activity in burglarizing her home. Dreiman v. State, 825 P.2d 758,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1992).

Cost avoided. —

In a prosecution for obtaining property by false pretenses arising from a construction contract that the defendant never completed, the appropriate amount of restitution was the cost of completion of the unfinished structure less the cost avoided as a result of the substitute completion transaction. Graham v. State, 2001 WY 5, 16 P.3d 712,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2001).

Costs of incarceration. —

This section does not authorize imposition of restitution for costs of incarceration in county detention center. Lee v. State, 2 P.3d 517,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2000), dismissed, 2007 WY 81, 157 P.3d 947,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2007).

“Restitution.” —

Where defendant challenged that portion of the original sentencing order relating to the imposition of assessments for the court automation fee, public defender fees and the Wyoming Victims' Compensation Fund, arguing that he was not informed of the possibility or specific amounts of such, his argument was misguided as none of the challenged assessments fell within the definition of restitution. Whitten v. State, 2005 WY 55, 110 P.3d 892,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2005).

Where defendant pled no contest to aggravated assault and battery, the district court did not err by ordering him to pay $63,428.29 in restitution to the victim under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-9-102

because defendant admitted at sentencing that the victim’s medical bills were valid and stemmed from the treatment he received following the assault and battery. Absent clear language in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-1-109

demonstrating the legislature intended a victim’s fault to be compared to the conduct of an intentional tortfeasor, the district court did not abuse its discretion by failing to consider the assault victim’s fault in determining the amount of restitution. Cave v. State, 2022 WY 30, 505 P.3d 191,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2022).

District court acted within its authority in awarding restitution for the victim's personal items that were inside his stolen vehicle because defendant admitted to stealing the vehicle and a jury convicted him of felony larceny, when defendant stole the vehicle, he stole the items that were contained therein, and defendant never denied taking the personal property, and at sentencing never contested the restitution requested on the stolen items. Layton v. State, 2007 WY 1, 150 P.3d 173,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 2007).

Restitution where defendant did not plead guilty. —

Crimes for which defendant could be ordered to pay restitution included only those to which he pleaded guilty and those he admitted in his plea agreement, and since defendant denied taking personal property from truck and, after preliminary hearing, district court dismissed count charging him with larceny of those items, court was without authority to order restitution for value of items. Van Riper v. State, 999 P.2d 646,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2000).

Where defendant pled nolo contendere to one of three burglary charges, the trial court erred by including in its order of restitution payments to the victims of the burglaries that were dismissed as part of the plea agreement as defendant did not admit to the crimes to which he did not plead and did not agree to pay restitution for those crimes. Penner v. State, 2003 WY 143, 78 P.3d 1045,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2003).

Restitution based on civil judgment. —

The statute makes room for a district court judge to use a civil judgment amount as the restitution amount; thus, where a civil judgment has been rendered against the defendant arising out of the same facts of the criminal case, the court may rely on that judgment to determine the appropriate amount of restitution. Graham v. State, 2001 WY 5, 16 P.3d 712,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2001).

“Victim.” —

An insurer may be considered a victim of a crime, and therefore eligible to receive restitution payments, only if the insurer does not have a subrogation right. Meerscheidt v. State, 931 P.2d 220,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1997).

District court had authority to order the appellant to pay the costs of a forensic examination to the agency that ordered the examination, where the agency suffered pecuniary damage as a result of the appellant's crime and the agency's statement as to the amount of the examination was credible evidence upon which to impose restitution.
Frederick v. State, 2007 WY 27, 151 P.3d 1136,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2007).

In a welfare
fraud case where restitution was ordered, a victim impact statement
from the Wyoming Department of Family Services was properly considered
because the Department was a “person.” Shafer v. State, 2015 WY 38, 344 P.3d 284,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2015).

The term “person,” as defined in § 8-1-102(a)(vi),

is the meaning the legislature intended to incorporate into the restitution statutes when it utilized the term in the definition of a “victim.” DCI. Merkison v. State, 996 P.2d 1138,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2000).

Workers' compensation division not an insurer for purposes
of restitution. —

It would be against public policy to allow a criminal defendant to avoid responsibility for damages he caused merely because the injured party was acting within the scope of his employment, and therefore, for purposes of the restitution statute, the workers' compensation division qualifies as a “victim.” Nixon v. State, 994 P.2d 324,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1999).

Division of criminal investigation. —

The division of criminal investigation (DCI) was a “victim” which had suffered “pecuniary damage” as a result of defendant's criminal activities, and therefore the district court did not err in awarding restitution in the amount of the buy money expended by DCI. Merkison v. State, 996 P.2d 1138,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2000).

Causation not shown. —

Restitution for the amount lost due to a victim's inability to secure loans after defendant allegedly ruined his credit was improperly awarded because causation was not established; there was no evidence that the victim would have qualified for the loans absent defendant's criminal conduct.
Hampton v. State, 2006 WY 103, 141 P.3d 101,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 2006).

Quoted

in

Jackson v. State, 891 P.2d 70,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1995); Fales v. State, 908 P.2d 404,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1995); Coleman v. State, 2005 WY 69, 115 P.3d 411,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(2005); Glover v. State, 2007 WY 169, 169 P.3d 553,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Oct. 25, 2007); Guinard v. State, 2014 WY 140,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Nov. 5, 2014).

Cited

in

Kaess v. State, 748 P.2d 698,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 553

(Wyo. 1987);
Jones v. State, 2002 WY 35, 41 P.3d 1247,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2002);
Abeyta v. State, 2002 WY 44, 42 P.3d 1009,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2002);
Crapo v. State, 2007 WY 194, 172 P.3d 393,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Dec. 11, 2007);
Smith v. State, 2012 WY 130;

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Oct 5, 2012); Hamilton v. State, 2015 WY 39,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Mar. 9, 2015).

For article, "Unpaid Restitution: An Underenforced Right of Victimsand Suggestions to Improve the Collection of Restitution in Wyoming”, see 12 Wyo. L. Rev. 367 (2012).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Statutes providing for governmental compensation for victims of crime, .

Persons or entities entitled to restitution as “victim” under state criminal restitution statute, 92 ALR5th 35.

§ 7-9-102.
Order to pay upon conviction.

In addition to any other punishment prescribed by law the court shall, upon conviction for any misdemeanor or felony, order a defendant to pay restitution to each victim as determined under W.S.

7-9-103

and

7-9-114

unless the court specifically finds that the defendant has no ability to pay and that no reasonable probability exists that the defendant will have an ability to pay.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 27, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

6-10-110

; Laws 1985, ch. 72, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1991, ch. 167, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to restitution as condition of parole, see §

7-13-421

.

Restitution proper. —

Where defendant pled no contest to aggravated assault and battery, the district court did not err by ordering him to pay $63,428.29 in restitution to the victim under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-9-102

because defendant admitted at sentencing that the victim’s medical bills were valid and stemmed from the treatment he received following the assault and battery. Absent clear language in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-1-109

demonstrating the legislature intended a victim’s fault to be compared to the conduct of an intentional tortfeasor, the district court did not abuse its discretion by failing to consider the assault victim’s fault in determining the amount of restitution. Cave v. State, 2022 WY 30, 505 P.3d 191,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2022).

Finding of ability to pay not required. —

After accepting defendant's plea agreement for committing arson, district court did not err by failing to make a specific finding that defendant had an ability to pay restitution; such a finding is not required under this section. Whitten v. State, 2005 WY 55, 110 P.3d 892,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2005).

Where the district court ordered $335,387 in restitution and did not find defendant unable to pay, it was not required to make any factual findings as to ability to pay. The conclusion that defendant was not unable to pay over time was supported by the facts that defendant was young and apparently capable, and an employer was willing to let him work 10-to-12-hour shifts at a minimum of $10 per hour.
Smith v. State, 2012 WY 130, 286 P.3d 429,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2012).

District court did not err in ordering defendant to pay restitution as it was not shown that there was no reasonable probability that defendant could at some future point in time assist her husband in paying a portion of the ordered restitution because the court was not required to analyze defendant’s financial resources in detail or to make findings as to her income or financial obligations; there was no evidence that her physical condition could not improve or otherwise allow her to earn money through prison work in the course of her lengthy incarceration; and no evidence was introduced that the government assistance she received would be eliminated once she was imprisoned. Smiley v. State, 2018 WY 50, 417 P.3d 174,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2018).

Court's authority. —

Restitution is not limited to the amount that must be proved for conviction so long as the amount ordered is consistent with the applicable Wyoming statutes. Kuebel v. State, 2019 WY 75, 446 P.3d 179,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2019).

Specific finding only when no ability to pay. —

A court must make a specific finding only when a defendant does not have a present or prospective ability to pay. Murray v. State, 855 P.2d 350,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. July 20, 1993), cert. denied, 510 U.S. 1045, 114 S. Ct. 693, 126 L. Ed. 2d 660, 1994 U.S. LEXIS 129 (U.S. 1994).

No error was found in the failure of court to articulate a specific finding of ability to pay the ordered restitution where the record was replete with facts from which the ability to pay could have been inferred. Leger v. State, 855 P.2d 359,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1993).

Sentencing court is under no obligation to determine that there is an ability to pay restitution. Nixon v. State, 4 P.3d 864,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2000).

In a welfare
fraud case, restitution was properly ordered in the amount of $ 90,722.79
because a district court did not have to make findings concerning
the amount of defendant's income and other financial obligations
in
the absence of an express finding that defendant did not have
the
ability to pay. Defendant was thirty-one years old, had a general
equivalency diploma, and had been employed at a job prior to a work
injury in which her annual take-home pay was approximately $24,000. Shafer v. State, 2015 WY 38, 344 P.3d 284,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2015).

“Strong suspicion” of inability to pay insufficient. —

The sentencing court's “strong suspicion” that a “reasonable possibility” existed that the defendant would not be able to make complete restitution did not rise to the level of being the specific finding required under this section that the defendant was unable to pay. Brenning v. State, 870 P.2d 349,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1994).

“Victim.” —

An insurer may be considered a victim of a crime, and therefore eligible to receive restitution payments, only if the insurer does not have a subrogation right. Meerscheidt v. State, 931 P.2d 220,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1997).

Workers' compensation division not an insurer for purposes of restitution. —

It would be against public policy to allow a criminal defendant to avoid responsibility for damages he caused merely because the injured party was acting within the scope of his employment, and therefore, for purposes of the restitution statute, the workers' compensation division qualifies as a “victim.” Nixon v. State, 994 P.2d 324,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1999).

Statute-based remedy. —

Absent statutory authority, sentencing court has no power to order restitution. Bishop v. State, 687 P.2d 242,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1984), cert. denied, 469 U.S. 1219, 105 S. Ct. 1203, 84 L. Ed. 2d 345, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 998 (U.S. 1985).

Sentencing court authorized to impose restitution. —

The correct reading of §§

7-9-102

and -103 and § 7-13-421(b), collectively, is that these statutes specifically authorize a sentencing court to impose restitution ordered a condition of parole unless the Board of Parole intervenes. Helmlinger v. State, 855 P.2d 363,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1993).

District court had authority to order the appellant to pay the costs of a forensic examination to the agency that ordered the examination where the agency suffered pecuniary damage as a result of the appellant's crime and the agency's statement as to the amount of the examination was credible evidence upon which to impose restitution.
Frederick v. State, 2007 WY 27, 151 P.3d 1136,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2007).

Costs of incarceration. —

This section does not authorize imposition of restitution for costs of incarceration in county detention center. Lee v. State, 2 P.3d 517,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2000), dismissed, 2007 WY 81, 157 P.3d 947,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2007).

Defendant must be advised on possibility of restitution. —

Rule 15(c), W.R. Cr. P., requires the trial judge to inform a defendant of the court's power to order restitution, although the exact amount of upper limit of restitution need not be specified at the time of the plea. Keller v. State, 723 P.2d 1244,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 604

(Wyo. 1986).

Restitution improper where defendant not convicted. —

Crimes for which defendant could be ordered to pay restitution included only those to which he pleaded guilty and those he admitted in his plea agreement, and since defendant denied taking personal property from truck and, after preliminary hearing, district court dismissed count charging him with larceny of those items, court was without authority to order restitution for value of items. Van Riper v. State, 999 P.2d 646,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2000).

Restitution proper. —

In a prosecution for larceny by a bailee of a motor vehicle, the evidence was sufficient to support an order of restitution where the victim impact statement detailed unpaid rental charges, costs of damages, towing, and storage, and the cost of a missing bench seat. Stowe v. State, 10 P.3d 551,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 2000).

Trial court did not err in ordering a battery defendant to pay restitution to the victim because: (1) there was substantial evidence showing that defendant inflicted the victim's injuries, (2) the victim could have recovered damages in the amount of her medical bills in a civil action, and (3) a reasonable probability existed that defendant had or would have an ability to pay.
Glover v. State, 2007 WY 169, 169 P.3d 553,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 2007).

District court did not abuse its discretion in ordering restitution against defendant where the victims' testimony concerning the value of their claims was credible and uncontradicted and based on the actual or fair market value of the items. Brown v. State, 2003 WY 72, 70 P.3d 238,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2003).

Where the district court found no evidence in the record regarding subrogation rights of the insurer, the district court did not err in requiring that restitution be paid to the homeowner. Whitten v. State, 2005 WY 55, 110 P.3d 892,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2005).

In a case in which defendant was convicted of being an accessory to the second-degree sexual abuse of a minor and third-degree sexual abuse of a second minor, defendant and her husband were jointly and severally liable for the requested amount of restitution of $17,515.20 to Wyoming Medicaid for its expenditures on behalf of the second victim as a result of defendant’s offenses because the presentence investigation report and the victim impact statement made by the second victim’s mother at the sentencing hearing together provided minimal but sufficient support for the district court’s award as the mother’s statement established that her daughter’s treatment included two periods of residential treatment at the Wyoming Behavioral Institute. Smiley v. State, 2018 WY 50, 417 P.3d 174,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2018).

District court did not abuse its discretion by ordering restitution in an amount greater than $1,000 for the misdemeanor theft conviction of a motorcycle where the State called a witness who testified that he had nearly life-long experience working with motorcycles, jet skis and cars, the witness was familiar with the Norton motorcycles owned by the victims, he testified, without objection, that the motorcycle had a value between $2,500 and $3,500, and defendant testified that the motorcycle was in poor condition, but he presented no contrary evidence as to its value. Kuebel v. State, 2019 WY 75, 446 P.3d 179,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2019).

Challenge to amount of restitution. —

Any challenge by the defendant concerning the restitution amount was waived by agreeing to a plan of restitution containing a specific amount owed and monthly payments and by making the required payments under the plan. Daniels v. State, 909 P.2d 972,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1996).

The demand for a hearing to develop a factual showing in the record concerning the reasonableness of the restitution amount is a challenge to the terms of the probation agreement. Any challenge to the validity of a probation agreement term must be made when the amount of restitution is determined at sentencing or within the time permitted by the rules after sentencing. Daniels v. State, 909 P.2d 972,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1996).

Where defendant admitted in writing to defendant's employer that defendant stole cameras, CDs, and DVDs, but only the cameras were mentioned in the criminal proceeding for larceny, it was error to order restitution under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-9-101(a)(i) for the DVDs and CDs because defendant did not admit to the crimes in the context of a criminal proceeding. Coleman v. State, 2005 WY 69, 115 P.3d 411,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2005).

Trial court erred in awarding restitution to a victim because there was simply nothing in the record to verify the replacement cost of the brass defendant took from her property other than her testimony, which unsupported by any documentation other than her written statement of the replacement value of the brass. Guinard v. State, 2014 WY 140, 337 P.3d 426,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2014).

Waiver. —

Defendant waived his right to challenge the factual basis of a restitution order because he entered into a plea agreement providing that restitution would be determined and did not object to the final amount of restitution ordered by the district court.
Smith v. State, 2012 WY 130, 286 P.3d 429,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2012).

Restitution plan. —

District court did not have authority under this section to require defendant to make a “bona fide effort” to have a total $335,387 of restitution paid within a five-year period. A restitution plan could not be imposed because the one-year jail sentence was not suspended.
Smith v. State, 2012 WY 130, 286 P.3d 429,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2012).

Causation not shown. —

Restitution for the amount lost due to a victim's inability to secure loans after defendant allegedly ruined his credit was improperly awarded because causation was not established; there was no evidence that the victim would have qualified for the loans absent defendant's criminal conduct.
Hampton v. State, 2006 WY 103, 141 P.3d 101,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 2006).

Applied

in

Farbotnik v. State, 850 P.2d 594,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 1993).

Quoted

in

Hart v. State, 2002 WY 3, 37 P.3d 1286,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2002); Jones v. State, 2002 WY 35, 41 P.3d 1247,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 3

8

(Wyo. 2002); Alcaraz v. State, 2002 WY 57, 44 P.3d 68,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Graham v. State, 2001 WY 5, 16 P.3d 712,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2001); Abeyta v. State, 2002 WY 44, 42 P.3d 1009,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2002); Penner v. State, 2003 WY 143, 78 P.3d 1045,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2003); Penner v. State, 2003 WY 143, 78 P.3d 1045,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2003); Crapo v. State, 2007 WY 194, 172 P.3d 393,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Dec. 11, 2007).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Jurisdiction or power of juvenile court to order parent of juvenile to make restitution for juvenile's offense, 66 ALR4th 985.

Requirement, as condition of probation, pursuant to 18 USC § 3651 (Repeal), that defendant make restitution to aggrieved parties, 71 ALR Fed 789.

Restitutional sentencing under Victim and Witness Protection Act § 5 (18 USC §§ 3579, 3580) [ 18 USC §§ 3663, 3664], 79 ALR Fed 724.